Idaho, session 2026, H0779.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1027, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1027. STUDENT ENROLLMENT COUNTS AND RULEMAKING. The state board of
education shall promulgate rules that set forth the procedures for determin-
ing student enrollment counts by school, school district, and statewide, and
the process for reporting such counts. Such rules shall be consistent with
the following:
(1) Full-time enrollment (FTE) shall be based on enrollment in any
school district or public charter school;
(2) A student shall not exceed a total of one (1.0) unweighted FTE in a
single school year, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(3) A kindergarten student shall not exceed a total of one-half (0.5)
unweighted enrollment in a single school year;
(4) A student attending a summer school or night school program shall
not exceed a total of one-fourth (0.25) unweighted enrollment. Such student
may be counted pursuant to both this subsection and subsection (2) of this
section;
(5) A fractional enrollment count schedule shall be specified for any
student enrolled less than one (1.0) FTE in a given school district or public
charter school;
(6) FTE is based on the courses a student is enrolled in at the time of
the official count, as specified in board rule, except that a student may be
counted as enrolled if the term for which such student is enrolled begins af-
ter the time of the official count;
(7) Each school district or public charter school shall conduct an of-
ficial count of enrolled students in the district or school on the first day
of October, the first day of December, the first day of February, and the
first day of April, or the previous school day if those dates do not fall on
a school day; and
(8) A school district or public charter school may shall not count as
enrolled any student who has unexcused absences totaling eleven (11) or more
consecutive school days immediately prior to and including the official
count date.
(9) A school district or public charter school shall not count as en-
rolled any student whose parent or legal guardian has not consented to the
student being enrolled in the respective school district or public charter
school.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.